Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2777.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Opioid Abatement
Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 30.6 of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, from any monies not otherwise appropriated from
the Opioid Lawsuit Settlement Fund (Fund 383) of the State Treasury,
the sum of Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) to be budgeted
and expended in accordance with law.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Opioid Abatement
Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 30.6 of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, from any monies not otherwise appropriated from
the Opioid Lawsuit Settlement Fund (Fund 383) of the State Treasury,
the sum of One Million Two Hundred Fifty-three Thousand Six Hundred

Fifty-eight Dollars ($1,253,658.00) to be distributed to non-
litigating subdivisions.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2777 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2777 Page 3